dictionaries/gl_ES/index.aff
FLAG num
SFX 115 0 chemos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P1 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 115 0 chemelle . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo / acusativo P1 + dativo P3
SFX 115 0 chemella . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P1 + dativo P3 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 115 0 chemellas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P1 + dativo P3 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 115 0 chemello . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P1 + dativo P3 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 115 0 chemellos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P1 + dativo P3 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 115 0 chemenos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo / acusativo P1 + dativo / acusativo P4
SFX 115 0 chemenola . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P1 + dativoP4 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 115 0 chemenolas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P1 + dativo P4 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 115 0 chemenolo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P1 + dativo P4 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 115 0 chemenolos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P1 + dativo P4 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 115 0 chemevos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo / acusativo P1 + dativo / acusativo P5
SFX 115 0 chemevola . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P1 + dativo P5 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 115 0 chemevolas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P1 + dativo P5 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 115 0 chemevolo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P1 + dativo P5 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 115 0 chemevolos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P1 + dativo P5 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 115 0 chemelles . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo / acusativo P1 + dativo P6
SFX 115 0 chemellela . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P1 + dativo P6 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 115 0 chemellelas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P1 + dativo P6 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 115 0 chemellelo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P1 + dativo P6 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 115 0 chemellelos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P1 + dativo P6 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 115 0 chelle . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P3
SFX 115 0 chella . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P3 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 115 0 chellas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P3 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 115 0 chello . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P3 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 115 0 chellos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P3 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 115 0 chellenos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P3 + dativo / acusativo P4
SFX 115 0 chellenola . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P3 + dativo P4 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 115 0 chellenolas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P3 + dativo P4 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 115 0 chellenolo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P3 + dativo P4 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 115 0 chellenolos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P3 + dativo P4 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 115 0 chellevos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P3 + dativo / acusativo P5
SFX 115 0 chellevola . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P3 + dativo P5 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 115 0 chellevolas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P3 + dativo P5 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 115 0 chellevolo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P3 + dativo P5 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 115 0 chellevolos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P3 + dativo P5 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 115 0 chenos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo / acusativo P4
SFX 115 0 chenola . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 115 0 chenolas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 115 0 chenolo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 115 0 chenolos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 115 0 chenoslle . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo / acusativo + dativo P3
SFX 115 0 chenoslla . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + dativo P3 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 115 0 chenosllas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + dativo P3 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 115 0 chenosllo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + dativo P3 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 115 0 chenosllos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + dativo P3 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 115 0 chenosvos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + dativo / acusativo P5
SFX 115 0 chenosvola . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + dativo P5 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 115 0 chenosvolas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + dativo P5 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 115 0 chenosvolo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + dativo P5 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 115 0 chenosvolos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + dativo P5 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 115 0 chenoslles . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo / acusativo + dativo P6
SFX 115 0 chenosllela . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + dativo P6 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 115 0 chenosllelas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + dativo P6 + acusativo P6 feminino
SFX 115 0 chenosllelo . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + dativo P6 + acusativo P3 masculino
SFX 115 0 chenosllelos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P4 + dativo P6 + acusativo P6 masculino
SFX 115 0 chevos . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo / acusativo P5
SFX 115 0 chevola . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P5 + acusativo P3 feminino
SFX 115 0 chevolas . pa:pronome persoal enclítico polisílabo P3 / P6 transitiva dativo P2 + dativo P5 + acusativo P6 feminino
